Utah statutes.
53A-17a-136.   Cost of operation and maintenance of minimum school program
-- Division between state and school districts.
(1)  The total cost of operation and maintenance of the minimum school program
in the state is divided between the state and  school districts as follows:
(a)  Each school district shall impose a minimum basic tax rate on all
taxable, tangible property in the school district and shall contribute the tax
proceeds toward the cost of the basic  program as provided in this chapter.
(b)  Each school district may also impose a levy for the purpose of
participating in the leeway  programs provided in this chapter.
(c)  The state shall contribute the balance of the total costs.
(2)  The contributions by the school districts and by the state are computed
separately for the purpose of determining their respective contributions to
the basic program and to the  leeway programs provided in this chapter.
